Alabama, session 2026rs, HB67.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 17-4-38, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§17-4-38
(a) The Secretary of State shall ensure that all
applicants obtain requested voter lists electronically and in
a timely manner. MethodsThe Secretary of State shall be
established for the transmission of tapes, discs, or lists to
any applicant establish procedures to allow any applicant to
request and obtain voter lists in an electronic format. The
Secretary of State shall notHindrances shall not be created or
devised to delay transmission of tapes, discs, or voter lists
to any applicant.
(b) Except as provided in this section, therethe
Secretary of State shall be a uniform charge for the
production of voter listsa fee not exceeding one thousand
dollars ($1,000) per electronic voter list produced.
TheOtherwise, the reproduction costscost of the basic
electronic copy of the statewide file, or any portion thereof,
Page 1

electronic copy of the statewide file, or any portion thereof,
HB67 Enrolled
shall be reasonable as determined by the Secretary of State,
and a fee schedule shall be conspicuously posted in the office
of the Secretary of State on the Secretary of State's website.
Costs of printed copies of lists are as otherwise provided by
law.
(c)(1) Access to the lists and voter history
information contained on the central computer in the office of
the Secretary of State is accessible to anyone making
application, except The voter lists and election history
information for the last 10 election cycles in which a voter
participated, as contained in the statewide voter registration
database in the Office of the Secretary of State, shall be
accessible to any person who files an application to receive
an electronic copy of a voter list and pays the required fee.
(2) The following personal voter information used for
voter registration purposes is confidential and may not be
disseminated:
a. Social Security numbers.
b. Driver license numbers.
c. Email addresses.
d. Telephone numbers which are not to be released.
e. Voter information protected by Section
17-4-33(b)(1).
(3) The prohibition against the dissemination of
confidential information in subdivision (2) does not apply to:
a. Federal, state, or local government agencies that
are authorized to confidentially access, use, and maintain the
information; and
Page 2

information; and
HB67 Enrolled
b.1. Any individual who registers for the first time or
who updates his or her registration information on or after
June 1, 2026, if the individual elects to have his or her
telephone number disseminated.
2. The Office of the Secretary of State shall establish
a method by which such individuals may elect to have their
information disseminated, including checking a box provided on
the registration form.
(d) Proceeds from the sale of tapes, discs, lists,
labels, or other materialsthe statewide voter list and
election history information from the Secretary of State shall
be retained by the Secretary of State for use in voter
registration.
(e) The Secretary of State shall provide, without
charge, each legislator one copy of the voter list in his or
her district within 90 days of his or herthe legislator
assuming office.
(f) Upon application and without charge, the Secretary
of State shall provide the Administrative Office of Courts
shall be provided with an electronic copy of the statewide
voter list no more than once a year for its use in the
production of a master jury list or for any other lawful
purpose.
(g) Upon application and without charge, the Secretary
of State shall provide the chief elections officer of any
other state shall be provided with an electronic copy of the
statewide voter list no more than once a year for any lawful
purpose, on the condition that the chief elections officer of
Page 3

purpose, on the condition that the chief elections officer of
HB67 Enrolled
the requesting state agrees to reciprocate and provide a copy
of the statewide voter list of that state to the chief
elections officer of this state upon request and without
charge, to be used for any lawful purpose. The Secretary of
State may enter into an agreement with any other state, at any
time, regarding the exchange of statewide voter lists.
(h) Resale ofExcept as provided in this section and
Sections 11-46-36, 17-4-1, and 17-16-2, it shall be unlawful
to sell or publish any portion of thea voter list or use voter
data or information maintained by the Secretary of State under
this section for commercial purposes by the Administrative
Office of Courts, or the office of the chief elections officer
of any other state, shall be strictly prohibited. The use of
the information on or derived from voter registration lists
solely for electioneering or for other permitted political
100 campaign or election purposes under the Fair Campaign
101 Practices Act does not constitute commercial use."
102 Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
103 2026.
Page 4

2026.
HB67 Enrolled
104
105
106
107
108
109
110
111
112 ________________________________________________
113 Speaker of the House of Representatives
114
115
116
117 ________________________________________________
118 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
119
120
121 House of Representatives
122
123 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
124 was passed by the House 05-Feb-26.
125
126 John Treadwell
127 Clerk
128
129
130
131
132
133 Senate 09-Apr-26 Passed
134
135
136
Page 5